Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1225.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3.1(a), 6(a) and 14(a) of the act of June 22, 1970 (P.L.378, No.122), known as the Nursing Home Administrators License Act, are amended to read:Section 3.1. State Board of Examiners of Nursing Home Administrators.--(a) The State Board of Examiners of Nursing Home Administrators shall consist of fifteen members as follows: six members shall be nursing home administrators, (two from not-for-profit facilities, two from operated-for-profit facilities and two from county facilities); three members who have been actively involved with the care of chronically ill and infirm 123456789101112131415161718192021 aged patients and who represent professions or occupations other than nursing home administration, such as medicine, nursing or hospital administration; three members representative of the consumer; and the Secretary of Health, or his designee, the Director of the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of Attorney General, or his designee, and the Commissioner of Professional and Occupational Affairs. No more than three professional members of the board shall be officials or full-time employes of State or local governments. No non-institutional member of the board shall have any financial interest in any nursing home. All members of the board [shall be citizens of the United States and] shall be residents of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 6. Qualifications for Admission to Examination.--(a) The board shall admit to examination for licensure as a nursing home administrator any candidate who pays a fee established by the board by regulation and submits evidence of good moral character and suitability prescribed by the board, and, that he is at least twenty-one years old[, a citizen of the United States, or that he has duly declared his intention of becoming a citizen of the United States,] and that he has completed preliminary education satisfactory to the board.* * *Section 14. Temporary Permits.--(a) In the event of unusual circumstances affecting the administration of a nursing home, such as death or disability of the licensed administrator, his resignation or dismissal, or other valid reasons as determined by the board, the board may, in its discretion, issue without examination a temporary permit as nursing home administrator to 20250HB1225PN1441 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an applicant who provides proof under oath, on forms prescribed by the board, that he (i) meets the criteria of age[, citizenship] and good moral character and suitability as provided in this act; (ii) has been nominated to be the nursing home administrator in this one particular facility which shall be identified on his application; and (iii) pays the application and license fees set by the board as a requirement for temporary permits.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1225PN1441 - 3 - 12345678910